California statutes. Financial Code
(6) The commissioner shall cause every California state trust company to be examined to the extent and whenever and as often as the
 commissioner shall deem it advisable, but in no case less frequently than once every 24 months.

(7) The commissioner may examine subsidiaries of every California state bank, state trust company, and foreign (other nation) bank licensed under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 20 of Division 1.1 to the extent and whenever and as often as the commissioner shall deem it advisable.

(b) The commissioner may at any time examine any of the following:

(1) Any office of a bank organized under the laws of this state.

(2) Any office of a foreign (other state) bank that maintains an office in this state.

(3) Any office of a foreign (other nation) bank that maintains an office in this
 state.

(c) The officers and employees of every California state bank, California state trust company, and foreign bank being examined shall exhibit to the examiners, on request, any or all of its securities, books, records, and accounts and shall otherwise facilitate the examination so far as it may be in their power.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

(a) Whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, it is necessary or advisable to make an extra examination of or to devote any extraordinary attention to any bank, any foreign bank, or any office of a foreign bank, the commissioner has the authority to do so and to charge and collect from the bank or foreign bank, in the case of an extra examination, a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination.

(b) Whenever in the judgment of the commissioner it is necessary or expedient for any examiner engaged in any examination to travel outside this state, the commissioner may charge for the travel expenses of the examiner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 8.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

(a) The commissioner may by order or regulation grant exemptions from this section in cases where the commissioner finds that the requirements of this section are not necessary.

(b) Each California state bank shall, within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year, or within such extended time as the commissioner may prescribe, file with the commissioner an audit report for the fiscal year.

(c) The audit report called for in subdivision (b) shall comply with all of the following provisions:

(1) The audit report shall contain those audited financial statements of the bank for or as of the end of the fiscal year prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and any other information that the commissioner may require.

(2) The audit report shall be based upon an audit of the bank conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and any other requirements that the commissioner may prescribe.

(3) The audit report shall be prepared by an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant who is not unsatisfactory to the commissioner.

(4) The audit report shall include or be accompanied by a certificate or opinion of the independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant that is satisfactory in form and content to the commissioner. If the certificate or opinion is qualified, the commissioner may order the bank to take such action as the commissioner may find necessary to enable the independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant to remove the qualification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

The commissioner, whenever in his or her opinion the condition of the bank, trust company, or foreign banking corporation is such as to require such audit, may require any bank, trust company, or foreign banking corporation to employ a certified public accountant to make a special audit of the affairs of such bank or trust company at its expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

The commissioner, for good cause, at any time and from time to time may employ appraisers to appraise the value of any investment, asset, or property held or upon which a lien is held as security for a loan. The bank, trust company, or foreign banking corporation shall pay to the commissioner on demand the cost of such appraisal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

The commissioner, a deputy commissioner, and every examiner assigned to an examination may administer an oath to any person whose testimony is required for the purposes of any examination authorized by this division and may by issuance of subpoena compel the appearance of any person and the production of any evidence for the purposes of the examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

Whenever he or she deems it expedient, the commissioner may call a meeting of the stockholders of any bank or trust company. Notice of the time and place of the meeting shall be given to each stockholder by a notice mailed to the stockholder by registered mail at the stockholder’s last known address at least 15 days before the date of the meeting. Any expenses of such meeting shall be borne by the bank or trust company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

507.

During any emergency period declared by the President of the United States, each bank shall conform to any order of the commissioner directed to it, relating to and conforming with regulations, limitations, or restrictions which are applicable thereto prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury, the Comptroller of the Currency, or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System regulating or governing the operations of banks which are members of the Federal Reserve
 System.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

During any emergency period declared by the Governor no bank shall transact any banking business except to such extent and subject to such regulations, limitations, or restrictions as may be prescribed by the commissioner, which, as to member banks, shall be as consistent as the exigencies of the situation permit with the provisions of the Federal Reserve Act and regulations issued thereunder or, as to insured banks, shall be as consistent as the exigencies of the situation permit with
 the rules and regulations governing banks whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

509.

(a) The commissioner may, in his or her discretion, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in a superior court to enjoin a violation of, to enforce compliance with, or to collect a penalty or other liability imposed under, this division or any regulation or order issued under this division. The amount of any penalty or liability collected shall be deposited into the State Banking Account in the Financial Institutions Fund. Upon a proper showing, a
 permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted, and a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, or other appropriate relief may be granted.

(b) A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary officer of the court appointed by the superior court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or of persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties, including the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or any other designated fiduciary officer of the court by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of,
 or with the approval of, the superior court.

(c) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in an action authorized by subdivision (a), a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution, disgorgement, or damages on behalf of the person injured by the act or practice that is the subject matter of the action. The court has jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(d) The provision of subdivision (a) that authorizes the appointment of a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, and subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply to any of the following:

(1) A state bank that is authorized by the commissioner to transact commercial banking or trust business.

(2) A national bank.

(3) A foreign (other state) bank that maintains a branch office in this state in accordance with federal law, the law of this state, and the law of the bank’s domicile.

(4) A foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed by the commissioner to maintain a branch office or agency, as defined in Section 1750, in this state.

(5) A foreign (other nation) bank that maintains a federal branch or agency, as defined in Section 1750, in this state.

(e) The provisions of this section that authorize the commissioner to bring actions and seek relief are not intended to, and do not, affect any right that any other person may have to bring the same or similar actions, or to seek the same or
 similar relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reports [520. - 521.]

520.

(a) A California state bank shall prominently display in the lobby of its main office and each branch office, except an automated teller machine branch office, a notice that any person may obtain a financial report from the bank. The notice shall include the address and telephone number of the person or office to be contacted for a financial report. The bank shall, promptly after receiving a request for a financial report, mail or otherwise furnish the financial
 report to the requester. The first financial report shall be provided without charge.

(b) The financial report called for in this section shall contain either (1) the information that the commissioner may require by regulation or (2) in the absence of a regulation, the last balance sheet and income statement, each without any schedules, that the bank filed with the commissioner pursuant to Section 453.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

(a) A bank or credit union subject to the examination authority of the commissioner shall report annually, on or before March 1, to the commissioner on the amount of revenue earned from overdraft fees and nonsufficient funds fees collected in the most recently completed calendar
 year and the percentage of that revenue as a proportion of the net income of the bank or credit union.

(b) (1) The commissioner shall publish, pursuant to paragraph (2), in a report the data
 for each bank or credit union required by subdivision (a) and make the report available on the department’s internet website.

(2) (A) The commissioner shall publish the first report required by this subdivision on or before March 31, 2023, covering data from the 2022 calendar year.

(B) In a calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the commissioner shall publish the report required by this subdivision on or before March 31 covering data from the most recently completed calendar year.

(c) As used in this
 section:

(1) “Nonsufficient funds fees” means fees resulting from the initiation of a transaction that exceeds the customer’s account balance if the customer’s bank or credit union declines to make the payment.

 (2) “Overdraft fees” means fees resulting from the processing of a debit transaction that exceeds a customer’s account balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 847, Sec. 1.   (SB 1415)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Nonsufficient Funds Fees [530. - 530.]

530.

A bank or credit union subject to the examination authority of the commissioner shall not charge a consumer a nonsufficient funds fee, as defined in Section 521, when the consumer’s attempt to initiate a transaction is declined instantaneously or near instantaneously by the bank or credit union due to nonsufficient funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 2017)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Enforcement [550. - 595.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [550. - 554.]

550.

In this article:

(a) “Appropriate licensee business” means the business that a licensee may conduct in accordance with the charter or license that the commissioner has issued to that licensee.

(b) “Customer” means a depositor of a bank, a member of a credit union, or a customer of any other licensee.

(c) “Holding company” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1280.

(d) “Officer of a subject institution” means any director, officer, official, or employee of the subject institution.

(e) “Person” means a subject institution or a subject person.

(f) “Subject institution” means any of the following:

(1) Licensee.

(2) Subsidiary of a licensee.

(3) Foreign (other state) or foreign (other nation) bank or credit union that maintains an office in this state, with respect to any such office other than a national bank or federal credit union.

(4) Any
 other person lawfully conducting the business of a bank or credit union in this state other than a national bank or federal credit union.

(g) “Subject person,” when used with respect to a subject institution, means any of the following:

(1) Director, officer, employee, or agent of the subject institution.

(2) Member, consultant, joint venture partner, or other person that participates in the affairs of a subject institution.

(3) Independent contractor, including any attorney, appraiser, or accountant, who knowingly or recklessly participates in any of the following acts if the act caused or is likely to cause more than a minimal financial loss to, or a significant adverse effect on, the subject institution:

(A) A violation of any applicable law, regulation, or order.

(B) A breach of fiduciary duty.

(C) An unsafe or unsound act.

(h) “Violation” includes any act performed, alone or with other persons, for or toward causing, bringing about, participating in, counseling, aiding, or abetting a violation of any applicable statute, regulation, provision of a written order issued by the commissioner, or provision of a written agreement made between the commissioner and a subject institution or subject person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

Any subject person who is entitled to a hearing pursuant to this article may waive that right at any time. A waiver under this section shall relieve the commissioner from having to issue a formal notice of hearing that would otherwise be required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

(a) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to Section 567, 581, 582, 586, or 591, or subdivision (c) of Section 587, the person to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(b) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner or within any longer period to
 which the person subject to the order consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(c) Within 30 days after the hearing, or within any longer period to which the person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to affirm, modify, or rescind the order within that time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(d) The right to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the person subject to the order to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

In addition to any other action or requirement the commissioner deems necessary or advisable, an order issued pursuant to Section 580, 581, 582, 585, 586, or 587 may require the person subject to the order to do any of the following:

(a) Make restitution or provide reimbursement, indemnification, or guarantee against loss, if the subject institution, subject person, or holding company was unjustly enriched by the action or
 violation or if the action or violation involved a reckless disregard for any provision of this division, of any regulation or order issued under this division, of any other applicable law, or of any agreement with the commissioner.

(b) Restrict the growth of the subject institution.

(c) Dispose of any loan or other asset.

(d) Correct violations of law.

(e) Employ qualified officers or employees, who may be subject to approval of the commissioner.

(f) Limit the activities or functions of the subject institution, subject person, or holding company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

If the commissioner takes possession of a subject institution without a prior notice or hearing, or takes action against a subject person without prior notice or hearing, the commissioner shall, upon taking possession or taking that action, concurrently provide to the subject institution or subject person a written order. The order shall set forth the condition or conditions of the subject institution or action or actions of the subject person that constitute the basis or bases for the
 commissioner’s action. In any case where the commissioner takes possession of a subject institution, the commissioner shall establish, by clear evidence, the basis for his or her action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Actions Involving the Conduct of Business by Unauthorized Persons [560. - 567.]

560.

No person who has not received a certificate from the commissioner authorizing it to engage in the banking business shall solicit or receive deposits, issue certificates of deposit with or without provision for interest, make payments on checks, or transact business in the way or manner of a bank or trust company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

561.

No person who has not received a certificate from the commissioner authorizing it to engage in the banking business shall advertise that it is accepting deposits, and issuing notes or certificates therefore, or make use of any office sign, at the place where its business is transacted, having thereon any artificial or corporate name, or other words indicating that the place or office is the place or office of a bank or trust company, that deposits are received there or payments made on
 checks, or any other form of banking business is transacted, nor shall any person make use of or circulate any letterheads, billheads, blank notes, blank receipts, certificates, or circulars, or any written or printed paper, whatever, having thereon any artificial or corporate name or other words indicating that the business is the business of a bank or trust company, or transact business in a way or manner as to lead the public to believe that its business is that of a bank or trust company, except to the extent expressly authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

562.

No person who has not received a certificate from the commissioner authorizing it to engage in the banking business shall transact business under any name or title that contains the word “bank” or “banker” or “banking” or “industrial bank” or “industrial loan company” or “investment and loan” or “savings bank” or “thrift and loan” or “trust” or “trustee” or “trust company” or act or advertise in any manner that indicates that the business is the business of a bank or trust company. Any
 building and loan association or savings association having in its corporate name words not clearly indicating the nature of its business shall state, on all signs, letterheads, and advertising matter, “This is a building and loan association” or “This is a savings association” or words to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

563.

No provision of Section 560, 561, or 562 prohibits any of the following from transacting any business or performing any activity if it is authorized by applicable law to transact the business or perform the activity and is not prohibited by any applicable law, other than Section 560, 561, or 562, from transacting the business or performing the activity:

(a) Any California state commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company.

(b) Any national bank.

(c) Any insured foreign (other state) state bank.

(d) Any foreign (other
 state) state bank that is licensed by the commissioner under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1700) of Chapter 19 of Division 1.1 to maintain a facility, as defined in Section 1670, in this state.

(e) Any foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed by the commissioner under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of Division 1.1 to maintain an office in this state.

(f) Any foreign (other nation) bank that maintains a federal agency, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 1750, or federal branch, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1750, in this state.

(g) Any California state corporation that is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, and that is authorized by the commissioner to engage in, business under
 Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21 of Division 1.1.

(h) Any corporation incorporated under Section 25A of the Federal Reserve Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 612 et seq.).

(i) Any foreign corporation that is licensed by the commissioner under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21 of Division 1.1 to maintain an office in this state and to transact at that office business under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21 of Division 1.1.

(j) Any industrial bank that is organized under the laws of another state of the United States and is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 26.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

564.

Any person or any bank violating any provision of the foregoing sections of this article shall be liable to the people of the state in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day or part thereof during which that violation continues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

565.

No person shall represent by advertisement, circular, or otherwise, or in any manner mislead anyone to believe, that any securities are legal investments for savings banks in this state or conform to the requirements of law relating to such investments, unless those securities are in fact at that time legal investments for such banks or do in fact so conform. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not more
 than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

566.

(a) The commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of this state in superior court to enjoin any violation of, to enforce compliance with, or to collect any penalty or other liability imposed under, any law subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner. The commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of this state in superior court to enjoin any violation of, to enforce compliance with, or to collect any penalty or other liability
 imposed under, any regulation promulgated under the power of the commissioner. The commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of this state in superior court to enjoin any violation of, to enforce compliance with, or to collect any penalty or other liability imposed under, any (1) agreement entered into with the commissioner or (2) order issued by the commissioner. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted, and a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, or other relief may be granted as appropriate.

(b) A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary officer of the court appointed by the court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners,
 trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court by reason of his or her exercise of those powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the court.

(c) If the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including a claim for restitution, disgorgement, or damages on behalf of the person injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award ancillary relief.

(d) Neither the provision of subdivision (a) that authorizes the appointment of a monitor, receiver,
 conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court nor any provision of subdivision (b) or (c) applies to any of the following:

(1) A licensee that is authorized by the commissioner to transact appropriate licensee business.

(2) A foreign (other state) or foreign (other nation) bank or credit union that maintains an office in this state in accordance with federal law, the law of this state, and the law of the bank or credit union’s domicile.

(e) The provisions of this section that authorize the commissioner to bring actions and seek relief are not intended to, and do not, affect any right that any other person may have to bring the same or similar actions or to seek the same or similar relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

567.

If the commissioner finds that a person has conducted, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to conduct, business that requires a license issued by the commissioner and that person has not been issued the required license, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, order the person to cease and desist from conducting any unauthorized business unless and until the person is issued a license to engage in appropriate licensee
 business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Orders Against Licensees and Subject Persons [580. - 583.]

580.

If, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commissioner finds any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) with respect to any subject institution, subject person, or any holding company, the commissioner may order the subject institution, subject person, or holding company to cease and desist from the act or violation:

(a) That the subject institution, subject person, or holding company has engaged or
 participated, is engaging or participating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the subject institution, subject person, or holding company is about to engage or participate, in any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the subject institution.

(b) That the subject institution, subject person, or holding company has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that the subject institution, subject person, or holding company is about to violate any:

(1) Provision of any division subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(2) Provision of any regulation promulgated by, or subject to the jurisdiction of, the commissioner.

(3) Provision of any other applicable law.

(4) Provision of any written agreement between the subject institution, subject person, or holding company, and the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

581.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 580 is true with respect to any subject institution, subject person, or holding company, and that the action, omission, or violation is likely to have any of the consequences set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or opportunity to be heard, order the subject institution or subject person to cease and desist from the following:

(a) Any act, omission, or violation that may cause the insolvency of the subject institution.

(b) Any act, omission, or violation that may cause significant dissipation of the assets or earnings of the subject institution.

(c) Any act, omission, or violation that may weaken the condition of the subject institution.

(d) Any act, omission, or violation that may otherwise prejudice the interests of the customers of the subject institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

582.

If the commissioner finds that a subject institution’s books or records are so incomplete or inaccurate that the commissioner is unable through the normal supervisory process to determine the financial condition of the subject institution or the details or purpose of any transaction or transactions that may materially affect the financial condition of the subject institution, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, order the subject institution to do either of the
 following:

(a) Cease any activity or practice that gave rise, in whole or in part, to the incomplete or inaccurate state of the books or records.

(b) Take affirmative action to restore the books or records to a complete and accurate state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

(a) The commissioner shall make public on the department’s Internet Web site all final orders issued pursuant to Sections 329, 567, 580, 581, 582, 585, 586, 587, 2148, 14303, 14304, 14305, 14307, 14308, 14309, 14310, 16200.5, 16900.5, 18349.5, 18356, 18357, 18358, 18359, 18363, 18367, and 18415.3 all decisions to modify or rescind an order pursuant to Sections 588, 14311, 16205, and 16905, all decisions to revoke or suspend a license pursuant to Sections 590, 591, 2149, 16202, 16203, 16902, 16903, 18349, and 18353, all decisions to revoke or suspend the designation of an agent pursuant to Sections 2150 and 2151, all decisions to approve resumption of business pursuant to Section 14314, and all decisions to take possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to Sections 592, 2149, 2150.2, 14313, 14315, 14319, 16206,
 16906, 18415, and 18415.4. This public notice shall be in addition to the notice required pursuant to Section 594.

(b) If the commissioner makes a determination in writing that the publication of a final order or decision referenced in subdivision (a) would seriously threaten the safety or soundness of a regulated institution subject to that order or decision, the commissioner may delay publication of the order or decision for a reasonable time.

(c) If the commissioner makes a determination that the publication of a final order or decision referenced in subdivision (a) would reveal information which would identify a customer of the institution subject to the order, the commissioner may redact from the order, prior to publication, any information that, in the determination of the commissioner, would identify any customer of the subject
 institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 699, Sec. 4.   (SB 1361)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Suspension or Removal of Subject Persons [585. - 589.]

585.

If, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a), any of the factors set forth in subdivision (b), and any of the factors set forth in subdivision (c) are true with respect to a subject person of a subject institution or holding company, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or removing the subject person from the subject person’s office, if any, with the subject institution or holding company, and
 prohibiting the subject person from participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution or holding company without the approval of the commissioner:

(a) (1) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, violated, or has caused a subject institution to violate, any provision of any:

(A) Division subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(B) Regulation promulgated by, or subject to the jurisdiction of, the commissioner.

(C) Other applicable law.

(D) Order issued by the commissioner or under the commissioner’s authority.

(E) Written agreement between the
 subject institution, subject person, or holding company and the commissioner.

(2) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound act in connection with the business of the subject institution, holding company, or any other business institution.

(3) That the subject person has, directly or indirectly, engaged or participated in any act that constitutes a breach of the subject person’s fiduciary duty.

(b) That, by reason of the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty described in subdivision (a):

(1) The subject institution, holding company, or business institution has suffered or will probably suffer financial loss or other harm.

(2) The rights or interests of the customers or members of the subject institution have been or could be prejudiced.

(3) The subject person has received financial gain or other benefit.

(c) That the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty described in subdivision (a) either involves dishonesty on the part of the subject person or demonstrates the subject person’s willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the subject institution, holding company, or business institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

586.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 585, any of the factors set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 585, and any of the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 585 are true with respect to a subject person of a subject institution, and that it is necessary or advisable for the protection of the subject institution or holding company, or the rights or interests of the customers or members of the subject institution, the
 commissioner may, without any prior notice or opportunity to be heard, issue an order suspending the subject person from the subject person’s office, if any, with the subject institution or holding company, and prohibiting the subject person from participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution or holding company without the prior approval of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

587.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in paragraph (1) and the factor set forth in paragraph (2) are true with respect to a subject person or former subject person of a subject institution or holding company, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or opportunity to be heard, issue an order suspending the subject person or former subject person from his or her office, if any, with the subject institution or holding company and
 prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution or holding company without the approval of the commissioner:

(1) That the subject person or former subject person has been charged in an indictment issued by a grand jury or in an information, complaint, or similar pleading issued by a United States attorney, district attorney, or other governmental official or agency authorized to prosecute crimes, with commission of or participation in any of the following:

(A) A crime that involves dishonesty or breach of trust and that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.

(B) A criminal violation of any provision of this division.

(C) A criminal violation of Section 1956,
 1957, or 1960 of Title 18 of, or Section 5322 or 5324 of Title 31 of, the United States Code.

(D) A criminal violation of a law of any jurisdiction other than the United States that is substantially similar to any of the statutes specified in subparagraph (C).

(2) That continued or resumed service or participation by the subject person or former subject person may pose a threat to the rights or interests of the customers or members of the subject institution or may threaten to impair public confidence in the subject institution.

(b) An order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall remain in effect until the indictment or the information, complaint, or similar pleading is finally disposed of or, if the order is earlier terminated by the commissioner, until the order is so terminated.
